District of Columbia statutes.
29-1112

Approval by members.

(a)

Except as otherwise provided in the governing principles, an unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the approval of its members to:

(1)

Admit, suspend, dismiss, or expel a member;

(2)

Select and dismiss a manager;

(3)

Adopt, amend, or repeal the governing principles;

(4)

Sell, lease, exchange, or otherwise dispose of all, or substantially all, of the association’s property, with or without the association’s goodwill, outside the ordinary course of its activities;

(5)

Dissolve under § 29-1124 or merge under § 29-1126;

(6)

Undertake any other act outside the ordinary course of the association’s activities; or

(7)

Determine the policy and purposes of the association.

(b)

An unincorporated nonprofit association shall have the approval of the members to do any other act or exercise a right that the governing principles require to be approved by members.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
This section is referenced in § 29-1118.
Uniform Law: This section is based on § 16 of the Uniform Unincorporated Nonprofit Association Act (2008 Act).